Washington statutes.
RCW 35.44.340

Reassessments—Limitation of time for.

No city or town shall have jurisdiction to proceed with any reassessment unless the ordinance ordering it is passed by the city or town council within ten years from and after the time the original assessment for the same improvement was finally held to be invalid, insufficient or for any cause set aside, in whole or in part or its enforcement denied directly or indirectly by the courts.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.44.340. Prior: 1911 c 98 s 45, part; RRS s 9398, part.]